WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
LANG tr_TR
SET UTF-8
TRY İiIıŞşÇçĞğÜüÖö-qwertyuopasdfghjklzxcvbnmQWERTYUOPASDFGHJKLZXCVBNM'
FLAG num

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 enleri .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 mizden .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 leştirmelerine .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 enlere .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 ttiğini .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 leştirmelerini .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 yacakları .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 ttiğine .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 leşmekte .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 larıma .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 undakilerin .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 müştür .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 lilerle .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 lanacaktı .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 larına .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 amayacağından .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 ışlarını .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 acaklarına .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 larınızla .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 lattıkları .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 cularından .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 lanın .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 tıracağı .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 ebileceğini .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 lanamamış .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 ştığını .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 ıyormuş .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 ebileceğine .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 lanıp .
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 laştırdıklarını .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 ımların .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 lanır .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 ıştığı .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 üyorlardı .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 leşemedi .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 esiniz .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 liklerle .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 laştıracağına .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 lilerin .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 leştiler .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 mamışlar .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 emeyeceğiz .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 çıları .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 ülmeli .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 sizce .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 luklarını .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 liğiydi .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 lendirmelerini .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 ılmaları .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 saydık .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 e .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 nabilecekleri .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 nirken .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 a .
SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 çisi .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 saydım .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 n .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 'sının .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 m .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 lamışlar .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 i .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 u .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 madıklarının .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 medi .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 mışken .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 t .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 anını .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 r .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 temediği .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 sizdi .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 mede .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 ilmezdi .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 ndır .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 ndık .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 nıldığını .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 ndım .
SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 yamayanların .
SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 ilemeyecektir .
SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 manızda .
SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 lamadıkları .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 tanların .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 laşmalı .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 ılabildiği .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 undayız .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 tirdiklerini .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 landırdığını .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 nmamalı .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 dandır .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 leşemeyecek .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 canın .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 rdi .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 leyebildiği .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 rmış .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 çiyi .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 leşmesinin .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 nmalıydı .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 'ıyla .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 ulduğundan .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 mamalarının .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 madıysa .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 lamaktır .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 landığı .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 nıyoruz .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 leyerek .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 ındır .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 ememişlerdi .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 leştirmekten .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 çiye .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 lerindeki .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 ebiliriz .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 üymüş .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 lısıyla .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 ılanların .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 yamadık .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 layabileceği .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 layanlar .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 emeyerek .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 ılığını .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 yamadım .
SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 nmemelidir .
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 mazlığında .
SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 tmadığı .
SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 leşirler .
SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 ndirme .
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 mamanın .
SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 ebilirim .
SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 lanmasın .
SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 larındansa .
SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 düklerinde .
SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 mamanız .
SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 layana .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 dirdikleri .
SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 düklerinden .
SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 amıyormuş .
SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 amadığımız .
SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 ştığına .
SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 ışa .
SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 dırılamayacağını .
SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 ebilenler .
SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 laşanlar .
SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 cada .
SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 ü .
SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 çiden .
SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 laşmış .
SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 dayız .
SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 laştırıyor .
SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 'ini .
SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 liklerin .
SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 'ine .
SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 sizim .
SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 lemelidir .
SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 sizin .
SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 lilerde .
SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 laşmayı .
SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 ıyorduk .
SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 leşebileceğine .
SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 leşebileceğini .
SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 amayacaklarının .
SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 acaklarını .
SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 ıyordur .
SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 mamayı .
SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 çılarını .
SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 lamalarındaki .
SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 ıyordum .
SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 lığımızla .
SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 diniz .
SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 larınızda .
SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 dığınızda .
SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 dığınızı .
SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 acakken .
SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 üyorlar .
SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 yamayanlar .
SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 luklarına .
SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 ı .
SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 tileceğini .
SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 emiyordu .
SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 ımızda .
SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 inizi .
SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 ememekten .
SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 liğinizi .
SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 cikleri .
SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 tılmış .
SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 tabilecek .
SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 meni .
SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 iyormuş .
SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 lıklarımızın .
SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 nmesinden .
SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 iciliğinin .
SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 ılmazlar .
SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 lanış .
SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 nışı .
SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 liğime .
SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 iyken .
SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 lanamayacağından .
SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 ırlar .
SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 mene .
SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 leştirilmesiyle .
SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 nıyor .
SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 liğinize .
SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 tamayacak .
SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 nmıştır .
SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 ulamadığını .
SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 inize .
SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 iyordur .
SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 lıyım .
SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 ebiliyordu .
SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 mayınız .
SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 iyordum .
SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 ş .
SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 liğimi .
SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 iyorduk .
SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 lanabileceğine .
SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 memi .
SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 lıların .
SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 sindekiler .
SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 meme .
SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 lanabileceğini .
SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 yamamış .
SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 lıyız .
SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 ilmemiştir .
SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 nına .
SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 liğine .
SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 leşebilir .
SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 tılamayacak .
SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 nmenin .
SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 liklerde .
SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 ırız .
SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 tiği .
SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 undayım .
SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 laşmasın .
SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 lığımda .
SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 lanabilecekleri .
SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 meli .
SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 liğini .
SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 ılamayan .
SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 amamaktan .
SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 cıların .
SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 nıyorsa .
SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 tırmanın .
SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 larımda .
SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 mamakta .
SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 namayacakları .
SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 nacağım .
SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 isin .
SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 dığımız .
SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 çılara .
SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 lattı .
SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 layarak .
SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 lanmasıdır .
SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 ilmişti .
SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 ludan .
SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 laştırmadan .
SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 emediği .
SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 lılıkları .
SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 ıncaya .
SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 ıldığında .
SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 mese .
SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 landım .
SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 landık .
SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 mesi .
SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 melerine .
SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 mizdir .
SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 amazsa .
SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 acaktı .
SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 ırım .
SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 cilere .
SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 esin .
SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 indedir .
SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 cileri .
SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 madıklarında .
SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 tmadıklarını .
SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 iliği .
SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 laşıyordu .
SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 lanamadığı .
SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 amayacağımız .
SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 ıcılığını .
SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 lanmışlardır .
SFX 378 N 1
SFX 378 0 mayarak .
SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 inedir .
SFX 379 N 1
SFX 379 0 laşması .
SFX 380 N 1
SFX 380 0 çılarının .
SFX 381 N 1
SFX 381 0 maktaydı .
SFX 382 N 1
SFX 382 0 rdı .
SFX 384 N 1
SFX 384 0 lılarından .
SFX 383 N 1
SFX 383 0 leştirilemez .
SFX 385 N 1
SFX 385 0 layışını .
SFX 386 N 1
SFX 386 0 leştirileceği .
SFX 387 N 1
SFX 387 0 leşmesinde .
SFX 388 N 1
SFX 388 0 ımızla .
SFX 389 N 1
SFX 389 0 riz .
SFX 390 N 1
SFX 390 0 eceksin .
SFX 391 N 1
SFX 391 0 laşmaya .
SFX 392 N 1
SFX 392 0 leşmekten .
SFX 393 N 1
SFX 393 0 çinin .
SFX 394 N 1
SFX 394 0 laştırmalarını .
SFX 396 N 1
SFX 396 0 asınız .
SFX 395 N 1
SFX 395 0 ildikleri .
SFX 397 N 1
SFX 397 0 duklarının .
SFX 398 N 1
SFX 398 0 melerini .
SFX 399 N 1
SFX 399 0 mamalılar .
SFX 400 N 1
SFX 400 0 müş .
SFX 401 N 1
SFX 401 0 ıcılığından .
SFX 402 N 1
SFX 402 0 rim .
SFX 403 N 1
SFX 403 0 ebilirse .
SFX 405 N 1
SFX 405 0 ınızı .
SFX 404 N 1
SFX 404 0 erler .
SFX 407 N 1
SFX 407 0 dayken .
SFX 406 N 1
SFX 406 0 nmaması .
SFX 408 N 1
SFX 408 0 asının .
SFX 409 N 1
SFX 409 0 yışları .
SFX 410 N 1
SFX 410 0 tirdiği .
SFX 411 N 1
SFX 411 0 ılabileceği .
SFX 412 N 1
SFX 412 0 cide .
SFX 414 N 1
SFX 414 0 abileceklerinin .
SFX 413 N 1
SFX 413 0 tılamadığını .
SFX 415 N 1
SFX 415 0 lerdeydi .
SFX 416 N 1
SFX 416 0 lık .
SFX 418 N 1
SFX 418 0 muşsun .
SFX 417 N 1
SFX 417 0 nsin .
SFX 421 N 1
SFX 421 0 masındaki .
SFX 420 N 1
SFX 420 0 mayanı .
SFX 419 N 1
SFX 419 0 tamadığını .
SFX 422 N 1
SFX 422 0 imdeki .
SFX 423 N 1
SFX 423 0 cılıkla .
SFX 425 N 1
SFX 425 0 lın .
SFX 424 N 1
SFX 424 0 laşmadığını .
SFX 427 N 1
SFX 427 0 lım .
SFX 426 N 1
SFX 426 0 lerindenmiş .
SFX 429 N 1
SFX 429 0 lıklarındaki .
SFX 428 N 1
SFX 428 0 tırdı .
SFX 430 N 1
SFX 430 0 emedi .
SFX 431 N 1
SFX 431 0 üyorum .
SFX 432 N 1
SFX 432 0 laştırmakta .
SFX 434 N 1
SFX 434 0 lide .
SFX 433 N 1
SFX 433 0 yamamıştır .
SFX 435 N 1
SFX 435 0 amayışı .
SFX 436 N 1
SFX 436 0 landıklarına .
SFX 437 N 1
SFX 437 0 leşmeler .
SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 lıklarına .
SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 laşamadığını .
SFX 439 N 1
SFX 439 0 indekine .
SFX 441 N 1
SFX 441 0 emeyecektir .
SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 amayacaklardı .
SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 ınıza .
SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 0 amadan .
SFX 444 N 1
SFX 444 0 dırmanın .
SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 0 ememek .
SFX 447 N 1
SFX 447 0 dırmaz .
SFX 448 N 1
SFX 448 0 ılmaması .
SFX 449 N 1
SFX 449 0 lığımla .
SFX 450 N 1
SFX 450 0 ünüz .
SFX 451 N 1
SFX 451 0 larımla .
SFX 452 N 1
SFX 452 0 ilecek .
SFX 453 N 1
SFX 453 0 nmelidir .
SFX 454 N 1
SFX 454 0 ilebileceği .
SFX 458 N 1
SFX 458 0 ünün .
SFX 457 N 1
SFX 457 0 yacağı .
SFX 456 N 1
SFX 456 0 layamayan .
SFX 455 N 1
SFX 455 0 cım .
SFX 460 N 1
SFX 460 0 cık .
SFX 459 N 1
SFX 459 0 imindeki .
SFX 461 N 1
SFX 461 0 laştırıldığına .
SFX 463 N 1
SFX 463 0 dığının .
SFX 462 N 1
SFX 462 0 caya .
SFX 464 N 1
SFX 464 0 mayacaklardı .
